src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ACCRA-OBL
               +Sg+Gen:   K     ;
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:   RHyph ; ! for placenames
               +Sg+Acc:   K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:t  K     ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Gen:   K     ;
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:   RHyph ; ! for placenames
               +Sg+Acc:   K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:t K ;


LEXICON ACCRA-IICASE
 +Pl+Gen:jd9   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9   K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde   K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn    K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;




! Vowel-final names where the final vowel carries
! primary or secondary stress. Monosyllables and
! Scandinavian stressed compounds in -V belong here.

LEXICON NYSTØ-ani
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            NYSTØDECL ;
         @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
        +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH      ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH         ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON NYSTØDECL
   NYSTØ-OBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL_PLC-ORG
   NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
   NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL
           +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
   +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K     ; ! Ny^stø:s
         +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a   RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:    RHyph ; ! Sub for Gen
                       NYOBL ;
          +Use/Sub:%:  NYOBL ; ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
          +Use/Sub:%-  NYOBL ; !
          +Use/Sub:'7  NYOBL ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL_PLC-ORG
           +Sg+Nom:    K             ;
   +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K             ; ! Ny^stø:s
         +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph         ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a   RHyph         ; ! Sub for Gen
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:    RHyph         ; ! Sub for Gen
                       NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
          +Use/Sub:%:  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
          +Use/Sub:%-  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
          +Use/Sub:'7  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
           +Sg+Nom:    K             ;
   +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K             ; ! Ny^stø:s
         +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph         ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a   RHyph         ; ! Sub for Gen
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:    RHyph         ; ! Sub for Gen
          +Use/Sub:    NYOBL_PLC-ORG ; ! XXX Why is regular declension Sub?
          +Use/Sub:%:  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
          +Use/Sub:%-  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;
          +Use/Sub:'7  NYOBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYOBL
               +Sg+Gen:       K ;
               +Sg+Acc:       K ;
               +Sg+Ill:j      K ;
               +Sg+Loc:s      K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n      K ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn     K ;
                  +Ess:n      K ;
               +Pl+Nom:t      K ;
               +Pl+Gen:jd     K ;
               +Pl+Acc:jd     K ;
               +Pl+Ill:jde    K ;
               +Pl+Loc:jn     K ;
               +Pl+Com:jgujn  K ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a      K ; !
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a      K ; !
       +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj     K ; !
       +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij     K ; !
       +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as     K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an     K ; !SOUTH
       +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn    K ; !
          +Ess+Use/Sub:an     K ; !
       +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at     K ; !
       +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd    K ; !
       +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd    K ; !
       +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde   K ; !
       +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn    K ; !
       +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn K ; !

LEXICON NYOBL_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Gen:    K ;
               +Sg+Acc:    K ;
               +Sg+Ill:j   K ;
               +Sg+Loc:s   K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n   K ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
                  +Ess:n   K ;
!+Pl+Nom:t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a   K ; !
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a   K ; !
       +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj  K ; !
       +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij  K ; !
       +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as  K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an  K ; !SOUTH
       +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
          +Ess+Use/Sub:an  K ; !
!+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at K ; !
!+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
!+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
!+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde K ; !
!+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
!+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn K ; !


LEXICON LONDON-SUBSTANDARD !SUB
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i K ; ! This is for "Statskog:i"
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> PLACE-DIMDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH             ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL
   PLACE-DIM-OBL ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL_PLC-ORG
   PLACE-DIM-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL
              +Sg+Nom:   K           ;
            +CmpN/SgN:   RHyph       ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:   RProp       ;
    +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 RHyph       ; !
                 +Ess:in K           ;
              +Sg+Gen:a  K           ;
      +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:   K           ; !
            +CmpN/SgG:a  RHyph       ; ! For dims, Gen is NOT sub
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:   RHyph       ;
              +Sg+Acc:a  K           ;
      +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:   K           ; !
              +Pl+Nom:at K           ;
                     :i  PLACE-DIM-i ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL_PLC-ORG
              +Sg+Nom:   K                   ;
            +CmpN/SgN:   RHyph               ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:   RProp               ;
    +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 RHyph               ; !
                 +Ess:in K                   ;
              +Sg+Gen:a  K                   ;
      +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:   K                   ; !
            +CmpN/SgG:a  RHyph               ; ! For dims, Gen is NOT sub
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:   RHyph               ;
              +Sg+Acc:a  K                   ;
      +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:   K                   ; !
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
                     :i  PLACE-DIM-i_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i
               +Sg+Ill:j     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:s     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:jd    K     ;
             +CmpN/PlG:jd    RHyph ;
               +Pl+Acc:jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:jdda  K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:jgujn K     ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Ill:j  K ;
               +Sg+Loc:s  K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n  K ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
!+CmpN/PlG:jd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
