src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aabo:Aa^bo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Aalbu:Aal^bu NYSTØ-sur ;
Aalmo:Aal^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Aláš:Aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Beassebohjogaš:Beasse^boh^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Belbo:Bel^bo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Bellingmo:Belling^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Bergamo:Berga^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Bergsmo:Bergs^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Birkejohsuohpáš:Birke^joh^suohpáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Bismo:Bismo9 NYSTØ ;
Bjølstadmo:Bjøl^stad^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Bjørkmo:Bjørk^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Bjørsmo:Bjørs^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Bo+CmpN/None:Bo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
Borkamo:Borka^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Borlo:Borlo9 NYSTØ ;
Byremo:Byremo9 NYSTØ ;
Byrkjelo:Byrkje^lo9 NYSTØ ;
Bákteváráš:Bákte^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
DiCaprio:DiCaprio9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Dilljaváráš:Dillja^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Divttasvuona-Hellemo:Divttas^vuon^a-Hellemo9 NYSTØ-LOAN ;
Dálbmejávrráš:Dálbme^jávrráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Echbo:Echbo9 NYSTØ ;
Einmo:Ein^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Elvemo:Elve^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Esbo:Es^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Fagermo:Fager^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Fladmo:Flad^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Formo:For^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Forsmo:Fors^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Furumo:Furu^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Gaskaláš:Gask^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Geatkkáš:Geatkkáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Glarbo:Glar^bo9 NYSTØ ;
Goaskinaláš:Goaskin^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Gorvvájogaš:Gorvvá^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Grensemo+Use/Sub:Grense^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Grimo:Grimo9 NYSTØ ;
Grimsmo:Grims^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Grønmo:Grøn^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Guollemarjogaš:Guolle^mar^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Guovžasuohpaš:Guovža^suohpaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Gussulloš:Gus^sullož PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Gájáš:Gájáž PLACE-DIM-sur ;
Gámasvuomuš:Gámas^vuomuž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Halbo:Hal^bo9 NYSTØ ;
Hambro:Ham^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Hellemo:Hellemo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Hoartnaš:Hoartnaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Høgmo:Høg^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Høylo:Høy^lo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Unnavuovddáš:Unna^vuovddáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Joramo:Joramo9 NYSTØ ;
Jorbajávrráš:Jorba^jávrráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Kalvemo:Kalve^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kasbo:Kas^bo9 NYSTØ ;
Kirkhusmo:Kirk^hus^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Korsmo:Kors^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Kosmo:Kos^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Krokmo:Krok^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kvermo:Kver^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kvernmo:Kvern^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Lasttaš:Lasttaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Lillemo:Lille^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Lundamo:Lunda^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Luossajávrráš:Luossa^jávrráž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Lyftingsmo:Lyftings^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Lyngmo:Lyng^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Miaš:Mi^až PLACE-DIM-ani ;
Mirkkaláš:Mirkk^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Mo+CmpN/None:Mo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
Modoroo:Modoroo9 NYSTØ-mal ;
Máhterinjáraláš:Máhteri^njár^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Ngo:Ngo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Niitomohkejogaš:Niito^mohke^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Njunáš:Njunáž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Nordhuglo:Nord^huglo9 NYSTØ ;
Nuorttaš+Use/Sub:Nuortaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !
Nymo:Ny^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Oažželuovttaš:Oažže^luovttaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Ockelbo:Ockel^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Poulsbo+Use/Sub:Pouls^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
Prestbakmo:Prest^bak^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Qingdao:Qingdao9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Reatkajogaš:Reatka^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Riderbo:Riderbo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Roahkastagaš:Roahkastagaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Rognmo:Rogn^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Ruohkkeváráš:Ruohkke^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Ruvjjáš:Ruvjjáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Rávdováráš:Rávdo^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Sagelvmo:Sag^elvmo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Sagmo:Sag^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Sandmo:Sand^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Sire% Máhte% jogaš+Use/Sub:Sire^máhte^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !
Skedsmo:Skeds^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Ski-Doo:Ski-Doo9 NYSTØ-ani ;
Skidoo:Skidoo9 NYSTØ-obj ;
Skogmo:Skog^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Skulstadmo:Skul^stad^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Skáiddáš:Skáiddáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Stormo:Stor^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Stuorajároaivvuš:Stuora^jár^oaivvuž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Suinajávrráš:Suina^jávrráž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Sureflo:Sure^flo9 NYSTØ ;
Svorkmo:Svork^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Teigmo:Teig^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Toardnaaláš:Toardna^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Torsmo:Tors^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Tronmo:Tron^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Uhcaroaváš:Uhca^roaváž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Ulláváráš:Ullá^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Unnaskáiddáš:Unna^skáiddáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Urraláš:Urr^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Vibo:Vi^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Vigdalsmo:Vig^dals^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Viterbo:Viter^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Vuohpoš:Vuohpož PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Värnamo:Värna^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Áibmeváráš:Áibme^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Åbybro:Å^by^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Örebro:Öre^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Østmo:Øst^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Čorvošjogaš:Čorvoš^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
